Utah statutes.
78B-5-405.   Determining the money of the claim.
(1)  Except as provided by Subsection (2), the proper money of the claim is,
as in each case may be appropriate, the money:
(a)  regularly used between the parties as a matter of usage or course of
dealing;
(b)  used at the time of a transaction in international trade, by trade usage
or common practice, for valuing or settling transactions in the particular
commodity or service involved; or
(c)  in which the loss was ultimately felt or will be incurred by a party.
(2)  The money in which the parties have contracted that a payment be made is
the proper money of the claim for that payment.
